Utah statutes.
53B-2-105.   Consultation with boards of trustees.

(1)  The board shall consult with the board of trustees or the president of the institution or both of them prior to acting on matters pertaining to the institution.

(2)  The board may do the following:

(a)  call meetings with one or more of the several boards of trustees;

(b)  invite other groups to meet with it; and

(c)  appoint committees, including members of  boards of trustees, administrators, faculty staff members, and students to perform duties assigned by the board.



Amended by Chapter 58, 1991 General Session

